Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Chapter 21 Uniform Partnership Act

Cross references. —

As to furnishing of security by nonresidents and partnerships suing by company name, see §

1-14-119

.

As to members of partnership as parties when judgment rendered in firm name, see §

1-16-505

.

As to executions on partnership property, see §

1-17-308

.

As to administration of the estate of a partner dying intestate by surviving partner, see §

2-4-201

.

For duty of surviving partner as to settlement of partnership business, see §

2-7-107

.

As to execution by partnership of application for liquor license, see §

12-4-102

.

As to joint accounts in savings and loan associations, see §

13-7-302

.

As to determination of rights of joint users or claimants in connection with irrigation and drainage districts, see §

41-6-301

et seq.

As to limited partnerships, see chapter 14 of this title.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1993, ch. 206, § 1, also enacted a chapter 21 (§§

17-21-101

through
17-21-115), which has been redesignated as chapter 22 (§§

17-22-101

through

17-22-115

) in light of the enactment of chapter 21 by
Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

Provisions of chapter are controlling. —

In general, the provisions of the Uniform Partnership Act are controlling in this jurisdiction. Coady v. Batchelder, 79 Wyo. 447, 335 P.2d 443,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1959).

Law was uncertain prior to approval of chapter. —

Prior to the approval of the Uniform Partnership Act, partnership, more than any other subject connected with business law, was fraught with uncertainty. Coady v. Batchelder, 79 Wyo. 447, 335 P.2d 443,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1959).

And earlier cases are of little help. —

Partnership cases decided in any jurisdiction prior to the adoption of the Uniform Partnership Act are of slight assistance, because they deal with the common law, while we are bound by statute. Coady v. Batchelder, 79 Wyo. 447, 335 P.2d 443,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1959).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Charging Orders Under the Uniform Partnership Act,” see IX Wyo. L.J. 112 (1955).

For article, “Partnership Taxation & The Limited Liability Company: Check Out the Check-the-Box Entity Classification,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 831 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d Partnership §§ 1 to 1230.

Duty of former partner, acquiring property occupied by partnership, to renew lease, 4 ALR2d 102.

Right of privacy, 14 ALR2d 750, 57 ALR3d 16.

Partnership matters as subject of declaratory judgment, 32 ALR2d 970.

Right of counterclaim, setoff and the like of the defendant against partners individually, in action to enforce partnership claim, 39 ALR2d 295.

Dismissal, discontinuance or nonsuit as to some defendants in contract action against partnership or partners as affecting others, 44 ALR2d 580.

Insurable interest of partner or partnership in life of partner, 70 ALR2d 577.

Specific performance of agreement, or provisions thereof, involving partnership at will, 70 ALR2d 618.

Effect of Uniform Partnership Act as converting realty into personalty, 80 ALR2d 1107.

Licensed real estate broker's right to compensation as affected by lack of license of his partners, 8 ALR3d 523.

Enforceability, insofar as restrictions would be reasonable, of contract containing unreasonable restrictions on competition, 61 ALR3d 397.

Ademption of legacy of business or interest therein, 65 ALR3d 541.

Construction of agreement between real estate agents to share commissions, 71 ALR3d 586.

Construction and application of expulsion provision in medical partnership agreement, 87 ALR3d 328.

Right of partners to assert personal privilege against self-incrimination with respect to production of partnership books or records, 17 ALR4th 1039.

Joint venture's capacity to sue, 56 ALR4th 1234.

Partnership or joint venture exclusion in contractor's or other similar comprehensive general liability insurance policy, 57 ALR4th 1155.

Determination of citizenship of partnership, for purposes of diversity jurisdiction under 28 USC § 1332(a), 83 ALR Fed 136.

47A C.J.S. Internal Revenue §§ 425 to 435; 68 C.J.S. Partnership § 1 et seq.